Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-201
Act, how cited.

Sections 86-201 to 86-211 shall be known and may be cited as the Telephone Consumer Slamming Prevention Act.

Laws 1999, LB 150, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 86-1901;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 63.